California, session 20252026, AB1121.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) California is facing a literacy crisis. Far too many children are not reading on at grade level by the end of third grade 3 and will not complete elementary school with the literacy skills and language development they need to succeed academically in middle school and high school. The vast majority of children falling behind are economically disadvantaged, disproportionately Black and Latino, and English learners. Ensuring access to high-quality literacy and reading instruction is a fundamental civil right and a moral imperative that the state must act upon immediately.(b) There are over 1,600,000 pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, in California and 63 percent are from low-income families. Seventy-five percent of pupils from low-income families are Black or Latino, and 34 percent are English learners. There are stark contrasts in achievement scores on statewide assessments: 3 in 10 third grade 3 pupils from low-income families are on grade level in English language arts, compared to 6 in 10 of their higher income peers. For low-income Black pupils, English learners, and pupils with disabilities, the gaps widen with only 2 in 10 pupils in each respective group on grade level.(c) California lags behind other states in reading outcomes. The state has one of the widest proficiency gap nationally in fourth-grade grade 4 reading between low-income and non-low-income pupils, and one of the widest gaps between English learners and non-English learners and between Black and White pupils. Over the last 20 years, these proficiency gaps have persisted and, in some cases, widened for California’s fourth-grade grade 4 pupils.(d) This is particularly concerning given that low-income pupils who are not proficient readers by the end of third grade 3 are eight times less likely to graduate high school. By third grade, grade 3, pupils move from learning to read to reading to learn, and those who are not on grade level rarely catch up.(e) With approximately 28 percent of adults not literate, California has one of the lowest adult literacy rates in the nation. Adults with limited literacy lack the skills to effectively navigate daily life. They are more at risk for remaining in poverty, less likely to be employable, more socially isolated, and less likely to live healthy lives. There is also a significant economic cost: eradicating illiteracy in California would increase the state’s gross domestic product by three hundred sixty billion dollars ($360,000,000,000).(f) A focus on literacy in the early years is essential because it supports critical brain development, helps children build strong language and communication skills, and fosters cognitive growth. Early literacy also reduces learning disparities and promotes social and emotional development.(g) Decades of interdisciplinary research demonstrate strong evidence about how pupils develop literacy skills. Fundamentally, research shows that children learning to read develop those skills through the same neurological processes regardless of their native language. Instruction that balances an emphasis on language development with foundational literacy skills—explicit and systematic instruction in phonological and phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, comprehension, and writing—has proven benefits for all pupils.(h) California has taken actions in recent years that are aligned with effective, evidence-based means of teaching literacy, including passing legislation to mandate early universal screening for reading difficulties and strengthening literacy teaching standards for teacher preparation programs so that new teachers are trained in evidence-based instructional strategies for teaching literacy. The state has also set out guidance in the English Language Arts/English Language Development (ELA/ELD) Framework and the English Learner Roadmap about supporting the needs of all pupils in California schools as they learn to read. Unfortunately, however, too many pupils in California are still not being taught to read using evidence-based materials, and not all current elementary teachers have received the necessary evidence-based training to teach reading effectively.(i) California must take stronger measures to address inequities and ensure that all pupils are proficient, skilled readers by the end of elementary school and that they are equipped to succeed in middle school, high school, and beyond. Those measures include enacting policies to ensure all classroom instructional materials used to teach children to read are evidence based and that current reading teachers receive training on evidence-based means of teaching literacy effectively.(j) California’s children must be equipped with the skills necessary to become productive members of our society, and of these skills literacy is among the most important.SEC. 2. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 44755) is added to Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: CHAPTER 3.5. Professional Development for Evidence-Based Literacy Instruction44755. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Applicable personnel” includes all of the following:(1) Any certificated teacher, or teacher with a provisional or emergency credential, who provides reading instruction to pupils enrolled in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 5, inclusive.(2) Any reading specialist, literacy specialist, reading coach, literacy coach, teacher on special assignment, education specialist, or bilingual teacher who provides reading instruction, or who supports any teacher who provides reading instruction, to pupils enrolled in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 5, inclusive.(3) Any school, charter school, school district, or county office of education administrator who oversees schools that provide reading instruction to pupils enrolled in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 5, inclusive.(b) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.44756. (a) On or before August 31, 2026, the department shall develop and submit a list of recommended professional development and training programs that meet the requirements of subdivision (b) for approval by the state board pursuant to subdivision (c).(b) In recommending the list of professional development and training programs pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall establish criteria for selection of those programs that does all of the following:(1) Ensures that programs provide training aligned to effective means of teaching literacy and evidence-based means of teaching foundational reading skills, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259. 44259, excluding subparagraph (C) of that paragraph.(2) Ensures that programs are aligned to the current English Language Arts/English Language Development (ELA/ELD) Framework adopted by the state board and the program guidelines for dyslexia developed pursuant to Section 56335.(3) Ensures that programs include effective instructional strategies for each of the components of effective means of teaching literacy and evidence-based means of teaching foundational reading skills, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, excluding subparagraph (C) of that paragraph, and that each component is sufficiently covered.(4) Ensures that programs include instructional strategies in word recognition skills that prioritize the use of phonics to decode words first and use word meanings and context to confirm reading accuracy.(5) Ensures that programs are interactive, provide adequate time to master the concepts being taught, and include periodic checks to demonstrate mastery of the concepts. The programs shall be at least 30 hours in duration and may exceed that minimum hour requirement.(6) Ensures that programs offer virtual options in both synchronous and asynchronous formats in addition to in-person trainings in order to ensure maximum access to the programs across the state.(c) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, the state board shall approve a list of recommended professional development and training programs in accordance with this section.(2) The state board shall state the reasons for disapproving any recommended professional development and training program submitted pursuant to this section.(d) At the request of the state board, the department may recommend additional professional development and training programs, consistent with the requirements of subdivision (b).(e) Upon approval of the list of professional development and training programs pursuant to subdivision (c), the department shall make the list of all approved professional development and training programs available on its internet website and shall update the list as necessary.44757. (a) Commencing September 1, 2027, local educational agencies shall ensure participation in the professional development and training programs required pursuant to subdivision (b).(b) Each local educational agency shall require that all applicable personnel satisfactorily complete an approved professional development and training program that is listed on the department’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 44756. The professional development and training program shall be completed by no later than August 31, 2029.(c) Any applicable personnel who provides documentation of having successfully completed a professional development and training program consistent with this chapter within seven years from the date that the approved professional development and training program list is published on the department’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 44756 shall be deemed to have complied with the requirement of subdivision (b).(d) (1) For the 2027–28 school year to the 2030–31 school year, inclusive, each local educational agency shall, at the end of the school year, submit a certified statement to the department with aggregate percentages by individual school of the cumulative applicable personnel that have received and satisfactorily completed the approved professional development and training program required pursuant to subdivision (b) or who have otherwise satisfied the professional development and training program requirement pursuant to subdivision (c). The certified statement shall also be made readily accessible in a prominent location on the local educational agency’s existing internet website in a manner that is easily accessible to parents and legal guardians.(2) The department shall post a list on the department’s internet website of the status of each local educational agency’s compliance with the requirement of subdivision (b).(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide funding for purposes of this chapter.SEC. 3. Section 60200 of the Education Code is amended to read:60200. The state board shall adopt basic instructional materials for use in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, for governing boards, subject to the following provisions:(a) The state board shall adopt at least five basic instructional materials for all applicable grade levels in each of the following subject areas:(1) Language arts, including, but not limited to, spelling, reading, and English language development. All English language arts, English language development, and reading instructional materials shall adhere to both all of the following:(A) Effective means of teaching literacy and evidence-based means of teaching foundational reading skills, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259. 44259, excluding subparagraph (C) of that paragraph.(B) Instructional strategies in word recognition skills that prioritize the use of phonics to decode words first and use word meanings and context to confirm reading accuracy.(B)(C) The current English Language Arts/English Language Development (ELA/ELD) Framework adopted by the state board and the program guidelines for dyslexia developed pursuant to Section 56335.(2) Mathematics.(3) Science.(4) Social science.(5) Bilingual or bicultural subjects.(6) Any other subject, discipline, or interdisciplinary areas for which the state board determines the adoption of instructional materials to be necessary or desirable.(b) (1) The state board shall adopt procedures for the submission of basic instructional materials in order to comply with each of the following:(A) Instructional materials may be submitted for adoption in any of the subject areas pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) at least once but not more than twice every eight years. The state board shall ensure that curriculum frameworks are reviewed and adopted in each subject area and that the criteria for evaluating instructional materials developed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 60204 are consistent with subdivision (c). The state board may prescribe reasonable conditions to restrict the resubmission of materials that have been previously rejected if those resubmitted materials have no substantive changes.(B) If a publisher or manufacturer submits revisions to currently adopted instructional material for review after the timeframe specified by the state board, the department shall assess a fee on the submitting publisher or manufacturer in an amount that shall not exceed the reasonable costs to the department to conduct a review of the instructional material pursuant to this section.(C) Submitted instructional materials shall be adopted or rejected within six months of the submission date of the materials pursuant to paragraph (1) unless the state board determines that a longer period of time, not to exceed an additional three months, is necessary due to the estimated volume or complexity of the materials for that subject in that year, or due to other circumstances beyond the reasonable control of the state board.(D) The process for review of instructional materials shall involve review committees, which shall include, but not be limited to, volunteer content experts and instructional material reviewers, and shall be composed of a majority of classroom teachers from a wide variety of affected grade levels and subject areas.(E) The rules and procedures for adoption of instructional materials shall be transparent and consistently applicable regardless of the format of the instructional materials, which may include, but not be limited to, print, digital, and open-source instructional materials.(2) The implementation of this subdivision shall be contingent upon an appropriation for these purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute. This paragraph is declaratory of existing law.(c) In reviewing and adopting or recommending for adoption submitted basic instructional materials, the state board shall use the following criteria, and ensure that, in its judgment, the submitted basic instructional materials meet all of the following criteria:(1) Are consistent with the criteria and the standards of quality prescribed in the state board’s adopted curriculum framework. In making this determination, the state board shall consider both the framework and the submitted instructional materials as a whole.(2) Comply with the requirements of Sections 60040, 60041, 60042, 60043, 60044, 60048, 60200.5, and 60200.6, and the state board’s guidelines for social content.(3) (A) Are factually accurate and incorporate principles of instruction reflective of current and confirmed research.(B) All English language arts, English language development, and reading instructional materials shall meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(4) Are aligned to the content standards adopted by the state board in the subject area and the grade level or levels for which they are submitted.(5) Do not contain materials, including illustrations, that provide unnecessary exposure to a commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo. Materials, including illustrations, that contain a commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo may not be used unless the state board determines that the use of the commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo is appropriate based on one of the following specific findings:(A) If text, the use of the commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo in the instructional materials is necessary for an educational purpose, as defined in the guidelines or frameworks adopted by the state board.(B) If an illustration, the appearance of a commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo in an illustration in instructional materials is incidental to the general nature of the illustration.(6) Meet other criteria as are established by the state board as being necessary to accomplish the intent of Section 7.5 of Article IX of the California Constitution and of Section 1 of Chapter 1181 of the Statutes of 1989, provided that the criteria are approved by resolution at the time the resolution adopting the framework for the current adoption is approved, or at least 12 months before the date that the materials are to be approved for adoption.(d) If basic instructional materials are rejected, the state board shall provide a specific, written explanation of the reasons why the submitted materials were not adopted, based on one or more of the criteria established under subdivision (c). In providing this explanation, the state board may use, in whole or in part, materials written by the Superintendent or any other advisers to the state board.(e) The state board may adopt fewer than five basic instructional materials in each subject area for each grade level if either of the following occurs:(1) Fewer than five basic instructional materials are submitted.(2) The state board specifically finds that fewer than five basic instructional materials meet the criteria prescribed by paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (c), or the materials fail to meet the state board’s adopted curriculum framework. If the state board adopts fewer than five basic instructional materials in any subject for any grade level, the state board shall conduct a review of the degree to which the criteria and procedures used to evaluate the submitted materials for that adoption were consistent with the state board’s adopted curriculum framework.(f) This section does not limit the authority of the state board to adopt materials that are not basic instructional materials.(g) Consistent with the quality criteria for the state board’s adopted curriculum framework, the state board shall prescribe procedures to provide the most open and flexible materials submission system and ensure that the adopted materials in each subject, taken as a whole, provide for the educational needs of the diverse pupil populations in the public schools, provide collections of instructional materials that illustrate diverse points of view, represent cultural pluralism, and provide a broad spectrum of knowledge, information, and technology-based materials to meet the goals of the program and the needs of pupils.(h) Upon making an adoption, the state board shall make available to listed publishers and manufacturers and all school interests a listing of instructional materials, including the most current unit cost of those materials as computed pursuant to existing law. Items placed upon lists shall remain thereon, and be available for procurement through the state’s systems of financing, from the date of the adoption of the item and until a date established by the state board. The date established by the state board for continuing items on that list shall be the date on which the state board adopts instructional materials based on a new or revised curriculum framework. Lists of adopted instructional materials shall be made available by subject and grade level to school districts and posted on the department’s internet website, and shall include information from the reports of findings from the review committees pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b). The lists shall terminate and shall no longer be effective on the date prescribed by the state board pursuant to this subdivision.(i) The state board may approve multiple lists of instructional materials, without designating a grade or subject, and the state board may designate more than one grade or subject whenever it determines that a single subject designation or a single grade designation would not promote the maximum efficiency of pupil learning. Any materials so designated may be placed on single grade or single subject lists, or multigrade or interdisciplinary lists, or may be placed on separate lists including other materials with similar grade or subject designations.(j) A composite listing in the format of an order form may be used to meet the requirements of this section.(k) The lists maintained pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to control the use period by any school district.(l) The state board shall give publishers the opportunity to modify instructional materials, in a manner provided for in regulations adopted by the state board, if the state board finds that the instructional materials do not comply with paragraph (5) of subdivision (c).(m) This section does not prohibit the publisher of instructional materials from including whatever corporate name or logo on the instructional materials that is necessary to provide basic information about the publisher, to protect its copyright, or to identify third-party sources of content.(n) The state board may adopt regulations that provide for other exceptions to this section, as determined by the state board.(o) The Superintendent shall develop, and the state board shall adopt, guidelines to implement this section.(p) For purposes of this chapter “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.SEC. 4. Section 60207.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:60207.5. (a) On or before January 1, 2027, the state board shall, for purposes of Section 60200 and using the evaluation criteria pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 60200, adopt basic instructional materials, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 60010, for transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, in English language arts, English language development, and reading.(b) The state board shall ensure that all basic instructional materials adopted pursuant to this section are aligned to the most recently adopted academic content standards and curriculum frameworks.(c) (1) The department shall publish the complete list of basic instructional materials adopted pursuant to this section on its internet website and shall distribute the complete list to all local educational agencies pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 60200.(2) This section does not prohibit the state board from periodically updating the approved list.SEC. 5. Section 60210 of the Education Code is amended to read:60210. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency may use instructional materials that are aligned with the academic content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605 or 60605.8, or former Section 60605.85, as that section read on June 30, 2014, including instructional materials that have not been adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60200, except as provided pursuant to subdivision (d) for English language arts, English language development, and reading instructional materials.(b) Instructional materials for mathematics and English language arts that are aligned to common core academic content standards developed by the Common Core State Standards Initiative consortium pursuant to Section 60605.7 shall be deemed to be aligned to the content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605 or 60605.8 for purposes of Section 60119.(c) If a local educational agency chooses to use instructional materials that have not been adopted by the state board, the local educational agency shall ensure that a majority of the participants of any review process conducted by the local educational agency are classroom teachers who are assigned to the subject area or grade level of the materials.(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), and commencing upon the state board’s adoption of basic instructional materials pursuant to Section 60207.5, all basic instructional materials in English language arts, English language development, and reading for transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, and any of grades 1 to 8, inclusive, adopted by each local educational agency shall satisfy the evaluation criteria pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 60200.(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), and commencing upon the state board’s adoption of basic instructional materials pursuant to Section 60207.5, a local educational agency shall not adopt basic instructional materials in English language arts, English language development, or reading that have not been adopted by the state board unless the local educational agency is granted a waiver from the state board pursuant to paragraph (4).(3) Any local educational agency that previously adopted basic instructional materials in English language arts, English language development, or reading before the state board’s adoption of instructional materials pursuant to Section 60207.5, that are not included on the adopted list, shall apply for a waiver from the state board pursuant to paragraph (4) within six months from the publication of the adopted list pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 60200.(4) (A) The waiver application shall include both of the following:(i) The rationale for choosing basic instructional materials not on the state board’s approved list.(ii) Documentation that the proposed basic instructional materials meet all the evaluation criteria pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 60200.(B) The state board shall act on the waiver request within 120 calendar days. If approved, no further action shall be required. If denied, the local educational agency shall have one calendar year from the date that the waiver request was denied to select and adopt basic instructional materials in English language arts, English language development, and reading, as applicable, from the state board’s adopted list published pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 60200.(C) On or before January 1, 2027, the state board shall establish the process that local educational agencies shall follow to request a waiver for selecting basic instructional materials not on the state board’s adopted list, consistent with subparagraphs (A) and (B).(D) The state board shall ensure that any local educational agency whose waiver is denied under this paragraph comes into compliance within the timeline specified in subparagraph (B).(5) On or before December 31, 2028, each local educational agency shall provide to the department, and the department shall develop, maintain, and annually update, a current list of basic instructional materials in English language arts, English language development, and reading, adopted by each local educational agency that is publicly accessible on its internet website.(e) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall report, on or before June 30, 2029, and annually thereafter, to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, the state board, and the Governor on each local educational agency that is using basic instructional materials in English language arts, English language development, and reading that are not from the state board adopted list published pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 60200 or that have not been granted a waiver pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d).(2) A report required to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(3) The department shall make each report required by paragraph (1) publicly available on the department’s internet website.SEC. 6. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.